Hawaii statutes.
§159-25 Slaughter, transportation, and
selling. No person shall, with respect to cattle, sheep, swine, goats,
horses, mules, or other equines, or carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat or meat
products of animals:

(1) Slaughter any animal or prepare any meat or meat
products which are capable of use as human food, at any establishment preparing
such meat or meat products solely for intrastate commerce, except in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.

(2) Slaughter or handle in connection with slaughter
any such animal in any manner not in accordance with section 159-21(c).

(3) Sell, transport, offer for sale or
transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce:

(A) Any meat or meat products which

(i) Are capable of use as human food, and

(ii) Are adulterated or misbranded at the time
of the sale, transportation, offer for sale or transportation, or receipt for
transportation.

(B) Any meat or meat products required to be
inspected under this chapter unless they have been so inspected and passed.

(4) Do, with respect to any such meat or meat
products which are capable of use as human food, any act while they are being
transported in intrastate commerce or held for sale after transportation, which
is intended to cause or has the effect of causing meat or meat products to be
adulterated or misbranded. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 7, §1; am L
1980, c 178, §2]

Cross References

Further regulation, see chapter 146, pt. II.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next